Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.08.030

Application for state trust company certificate of authority.

(1) An application for a certificate of authority to become a state trust company must be made under oath and in the form required by the director and must be supported by information, data, records, and opinions of counsel that the director requires including, without limitation and as requested by the department, authorizations by the incorporators and any proposed officer, director, manager, or managing participant to perform third-party background checks on them, plus fingerprints of these persons obtained from acceptable fingerprinting authorities.

(2) Consistent with RCW 30B.12.020(1), the application to organize a state trust company must propose as members of the board of directors not less than five directors, managers, or managing participants, at least two of whom shall not be officers, employees, or agents of the state trust company, or otherwise in control of the state trust company, either as a principal or in a representative capacity, as "control" is defined in RCW 30B.53.005.

(3) Prior to issuance of a certificate of authority by the department, the proposed members of the board of directors, as approved by the department, must each submit a declaration in conformity with RCW 30B.12.020(5).

(4) The application must be accompanied by all fees and deposits required by statute or by rule of the director.

(5) The director shall issue a certificate of authority to a state trust company only on proof that one or more viable markets exist within or outside of Washington state that may be served in a profitable manner by the establishment of the proposed state trust company. In making such a determination, the director shall:

(a) Examine the business plan which shall be submitted as part of the application for a certificate of authority to become a state trust company; and

(b) Consider:

(i) The market or markets to be served;

(ii) Whether the proposed organizational and capital structure and amount of initial capitalization is adequate for the proposed business and location;

(iii) Whether the anticipated volume and nature of business indicates a reasonable probability of success and profitability based on the market sought to be served;

(iv) Whether the proposed officers, directors, and managers, or managing participants, as a group, have sufficient fiduciary experience, ability, standing, competence, trustworthiness, and integrity to justify a belief that the proposed state trust company will operate in compliance with law and that success of the proposed state trust company is probable;

(v) Whether each principal shareholder or participant has sufficient experience, ability, standing, competence, trustworthiness, and integrity to justify a belief that the proposed state trust company will be free from improper or unlawful influence or interference with respect to the state trust company's operation in compliance with law; and

(vi) Whether the organizers are acting in good faith.

(6) The failure of an applicant to furnish required information, data, opinions of counsel, other material, or the required fee is considered an abandonment of the application.

[ 2019 c 389 s 7; 2014 c 37 s 324.]